Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-384
Construction, installation, operation, maintenance; permit required.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to construct, install, operate, or maintain in or along the streets, alleys and public ways, or elsewhere within the limits of any county, and outside of the limits of any incorporated city or village a community antenna television service without first obtaining, from such county, a permit which permit shall authorize the grantee to provide community antenna television service on a nonexclusive basis within the limits of the county.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 2.